Hawaii statutes.
[§658B-8] Conversions of foreign money in a
distribution proceeding. The rate of exchange prevailing at or near the
closing of business on the day the proceeding is initiated shall govern all
exchanges of foreign money in a distribution proceeding. A foreign-money
claimant in a distribution proceeding must assert its claim in the named
foreign money and show the amount of United States dollars resulting from a
conversion as of the date the proceeding was initiated. [L 1990, c 50, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next